src/morphology/yrk-all.lexc
LEXICON N_ВЫӇО  !!= @CODE@ выʼ:вы 29  ProsSg -мна /-мана
!! ң /total=16/
!! вы’(ң) wíh	вы̄нд’ wínt°h	вы” wí°q	выңо wíŋo
+N:Ӈ1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:Ӈ1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:Ӈ1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
+N:Ӈ1 SGPROSSUF ;
+N:Ӈ1 PLNOMSUF ;
+N:Ӈ1 PLACCSUF_О ;
+N:Ӈ1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
+N:Ӈ1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ИЛЪЕ  !!= @CODE@ илʼ:ил 30   ProsSg -мана
!! Yaml: __ilje__
!! ң /total=13/
!! ил’(ң) yil°h	илӑнд’ yilənt°h	ила” yilə°q	илъе yil°ye
+N: NMN_ИЛЪЕ ;

LEXICON N_ИЛЪЕ-Pal/Var
+N: NMN_ИЛЪЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ИЛЪЕ
:%>аӇ1 SGDATSUF ;
:Ӈ1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
!+N:аӇ1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:Ӈ1 SGNOMSUF ; !!= @CODE@ 
:Ӈ1 SG-NOM-STEM ; !!= @CODE@ 
:Ӈ1 SGPROSSUF ;
:а PLNOMSUF ;
:ъ PLACCSUF_Е ;
:Ӈ1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:Ӈ1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  !!= @CODE@ ненэцьʼ:ненэць 30   ProsSg -мана
!! Yaml: __nyenecyh__
!! ң /total=13/
!! ил’(ң) yil°h	илӑнд’ yilənt°h	ила” yilə°q	илъе yil°ye
+N:%>аӇ1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:%>аӇ1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:Ӈ1 SGNOMSUF ; !!= @CODE@ 
+N:%>аӇ1 SG-NOM-STEM ; !!= @CODE@ 
+N:Ӈ1 SGPROSSUF ;
+N:%>а PLNOMSUF ;
+N:%>и PLACCSUF_Е ;
+N:%>аӇ1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
+N:%>аӇ1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ПАХАЁ  !!= @CODE@ пӑхӑʼ: 31   ProsSg -мна
!! ң /total=2/
!! пӑхӑ’(ң) pəx°h	пӑхӑнд’ pəxənt°h	пӑха” pəxə°q	пӑхӑё pəx°yo
+N:Ӈ1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:аӇ1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:аӇ1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
+N:аӇ1 PLNOMSUF ;
+N: PLACCSUF_Ё ;

LEXICON N_СЕРО  !!= @CODE@ серˮ: 32   ProsSg -мана / -мня
!! /total=16/
!! сер” syer	серт’ syert°h	сер” syer°q	серо syero
+N:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:Д1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:Д1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
+N:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
+N:Д1 PLACCSUF_О ;

LEXICON N_ТАРЕ  !!= @CODE@ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
!! /total=0/
!! тӑр” tər	тӑрт’ tərt°h	тӑр” tər°q	тӑре tərye
+N: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var !! Where is the variation?
+N: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ТАРЕ  !!= @CODE@ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
:Д1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:Д1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:Д1 SGPROSSUF ;
:Д1 SGLOCSUF_Хна ; 
:Д1 SGLOCSUF_Хана ;
:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
:Д1 PLACCSUF_Е ;

LEXICON N_МАНСО  !!= @CODE@ мӑнˮ: 34   ProsSg -мна
!! /total=6/
!! мӑн”(с) mən°q	мӑнӑт’ mənət°h	мӑнӑс” mənəs°q	мӑнсо mən°so
+N:С1 SGDATSUF ;
+N:аС1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
+N:аС1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
+N:С1 SGPROSSUF ;
+N:аС1 PLNOMSUF ;
+N:С1 PLACCSUF_О ;

LEXICON N_МЯДО  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!! /total=18/
!! Yaml: __myado__
!! мя”(д) myaq	мят’ myat°h	мяд” myad°q	мядо myado
+N: NMN_МЯДО ;
+N+Lim:ˮли NMN_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON N_ВАР/МЯДО
 N_МЯДО ;

LEXICON N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!!= @CODE@ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
    N_МЯДО ;
:Д1 PLACCSUF_Е ;

LEXICON NMN_ВАР  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __waro__
:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
:Д1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:Д1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:Д1 SGLOCSUF_Хна ; 
:Д1 SGLOCSUF_Хана ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_О ;
:Д1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:Д1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_МЯДО  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __myado__
:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
:Д1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:Д1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:Д1 SGLOCSUF_Хна ; !!= @CODE@ мякна
:Д1 SGPROSSUF ;
!:Д1 SGPROSSUF_АМНА ;
:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
:Д1 PLACCSUF_О ;
:Д1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:Д1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ИДЕ  !!= @CODE@ иˮ: 36   ProsSg -мна
!! Yaml: __yidye__
!! /total=1/
!! и”(д) yiq	ит’ yit°h	ид” yid°q	иде yidye
+N: NMN_ИДЕ ;

LEXICON N_ИДЕ-Pal/Var !! Where is the variation?
+N: NMN_ИДЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ИДЕ !! Where is the variation?
:Д1 SGDATSUF ;
:аС1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:аС1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:Д1 PLNOMSUF ;
:Д1 PLACCSUF_Е ;
:Д1  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:Д1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ИДЕ/МЯДО
 N_ИДЕ ;
 N_МЯДО ;
 
LEXICON N_ТЮСЕ  !!= @CODE@ тюˮ:тюсе 
+N: NMN_ТЮСЕ ;

LEXICON NMN_ТЮСЕ
:С1 SGDATSUF ;
:С1 SG-ACC-STEM ;
:С1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
:С1 PLNOMSUF ;
:с PLACCSUF_Е ;
:С1 POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
:С1 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ
 N_ТАСО ;
 N_ТЮСЕ ;

LEXICON N_ӇАВО 
+N: NMN_ӇАВО ;

LEXICON NMN_ӇАВО !!Provisional solution
:мгэ SGDATSUF ;
:мгэ SG-ACC-STEM ;
:мгэ SG-NOM-STEM ;
:мгэ SGPROSSUF ;
:мгэ PLNOMSUF ;
:в PLACCSUF_О ; 
:мгэ POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
:мгэ POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON N_Vow
+TYÄ+N: K ;

!LEXICON N_ЕСЯ  >> N_ӇОДИ/ПИСЬ = @CODE@ 
!+N: NMN_Vow ;

LEXICON	    N_САВНЕ !!= @CODE@ 
+TYÄ+N: K ;

!LEXICON	    N_СЁ  >> N_ӇЭ/СЁЁ/ХАБИЕ= @CODE@ 
!+N: NMN_Vow ;

!LEXICON	    N_ӇЭСЫ  >> N_ӇЭ= @CODE@ ӈэсы:ӈэсы
!+N: NMN_Vow ;

!LEXICON	    N_ЯКЭ  >> N_ЯКЫ
!+N: NMN_Vow ;

LEXICON	    N_ПЕНЗЕРЕ !!= @CODE@ пензерˮ:пензер
 N_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON	N_САБЦЬ  !!= @CODE@ сабць:сабць
 N_ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON N_МЕРЁ !!= @CODE@ мерё:мерё
 N_ӇАНУ ;


!! NMN
LEXICON NMN_ТИРЕ/ХАНО
 SGDATSUF ;
:а  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; 


LEXICON NMN_ӇЭ !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ; !!= @CODE@ SGACCSUF, SGGENSUF
  SG-NOM-STEM ; !!= @CODE@ SG/DAT,LOC, ABL,TRA,PRO; DU/NOM,ACC,GEN; PL/DAT,LOC,ABL,TRA; PX-s, NOMINAL-CONJUGATION
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;  !!= @CODE@ 
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !!= @CODE@ => PL-ACC_STEM
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_Ё   !!= @CODE@ я:я 2 !!ProsSg -вна
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ; 
  PLPROSSUF ;
  POSSESSA-PL-PROS_ˮмана ;
+Pl+Pros:%^A2O%>ˮмна K ;
:%^A2O PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ӇЭ/Ё
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !!
:%^A2O PLACCSUF_Zero ; 

LEXICON NMN_ПИ !!= @CODE@ пя: 3 !!ProsSg -вна
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
:%^A2I PLACCSUF_Zero ; 
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ТЫ  !!= @CODE@ ты:ты 4 !!ProsSg -вна
!! /total=4/
!! ты ti        тэ̇н’ ten°h     ты” tiq ты tí
:%^VowLower SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%^VowLower  SG-NOM-STEM ;
+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3:%>сь K ;
+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:%>ць K ;
:%^VowLower SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
+Pl+Pros:%^VowLower%>ˮэмна K ; !!= @CODE@ This will need schwa to surface
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
:%^VowLower  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%^VowLower POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ХАВО  !!= @CODE@ ха: 5 !!ProsSg -вна
!! /total=1/
!! ха xa        хан’ xan°h      ха” xaq хаво xawo
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
:в PLACCSUF_О ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_СЁЁ  !!= @CODE@ сё: 6 !!ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!! сё syo       сён’ syon°h     сё” syoq        сёё syoyo
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Ё ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL_ХАЮН ;

LEXICON NMN_ИБЕ  !!= @CODE@ и: 7 !!ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!! и yí ин’ yín°h       и” yíq  ибе yíbye
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
:б PLACCSUF_Е ; !

LEXICON NMN_ХАБИЕ  !!= @CODE@ хӑби:8 !!ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!! хӑби xəbyi  хӑбин’ xəbyin°h        хӑби” xəbyiq   хӑбие xəbyiy
 SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Е ; !

LEXICON NMN_ӇЭ/СЁЁ/ХАБИЕ
 SGDATSUF ;
 SG-ACC-STEM ;
 SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
 PLNOMSUF ;
 PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
 PLACCSUF_Ё ; !
 PLACCSUF_Е ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL_ХАЮН ;


LEXICON NMN_ПАНЫ !! 9
:%^VowLower SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%^VowLower SG-NOM-STEM ;
  SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
:%^VowLower  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
:%^VowLower POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ !!= @CODE@ хусувэй: 10 !!ProsSg -ювна
  SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
 SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ; !!= @CODE@ +Pl+Dat, +Pl+Loc, +Pl+Abl
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON NMN_ЕД/ХАНО
:а SGDATSUF ;
  SG-ACC-STEM ;
  SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%>у SGPROSSUF ;
  PLNOMSUF ;
  PLACCSUF_Zero ; !
  PLACCSUF_О ; !
  POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
!:%>о  POSSESSA-PLURAL ;
 POSSESSA-DUAL ;

LEXICON nouns
варе:варе N_САВНЕ  "ponnistus" ;
выʼ:вы N_ВЫӇО  "tundra" ;
едё:едё N_МЕРЁ  "suoli" ;
ендˮ:енд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "virta" ;
есʼ:ес N_ВЫӇО  "ansa" ;
есерˮ:есер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "uudin" ;
иˮ:и N_ИДЕ  "vesi" ;
икадˮ:икад N_МЯДО  "kaulus" ;
илʼ:ил N_ИЛЪЕ  "elämä" ;
иларˮ:илар N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "harhanäky" ;
илерˮ:илер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "elämä" ;
индˮ:инд N_ИДЕ/МЯДО  "henkäys" ;
иркадё:иркадё N_МЕРЁ  "kirskahdus" ;
лабацьʼ:лабаць N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  "viiri" ;
лабрё:лабрё N_МЕРЁ  "tuulen kohina" ;
лахабˮ:лахаб N_СЕРО  "pintarasva" ;
лахацьʼ:лахаць N_ИЛЪЕ  "mätäs" ;
лекарцё:лекарцё N_МЕРЁ  "lääke" ;
маларё:маларё N_МЕРЁ  "lörpötys" ;
манзадаиˮ:манзадаи N_МЯДО  "mahdollisuus liikkua" ;
марˮ:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rauhanen" ;
марˮ:мар N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "urosvilliporo" ;
масерˮ:масер N_ТАРЕ  "tupsu" ;
масерˮ:мэсяр N_ТАРЕ  "tupsu" ;
мирˮ:мир N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "tavara" ;
муноцьʼ:муноць N_ИЛЪЕ  "parta viikseineen" ;
муё:муё N_МЕРЁ  "tulva" ;
мэсыˮ:мэсы N_МЯДО  "tapa" ;
мяроʼ:мяро N_ВЫӇО  "ihmisen kuolinpaikkaan pystytetty pieni kota" ;
нароʼ:наро N_ВЫӇО  "reen turkisistuin" ;
ненэцьʼ:ненэць N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  "nenetsi" ;
нерˮ:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "rusto" ;
нерˮ:нер N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "valkuainen" ;
нерацьʼ:нераць N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  "ämpäri" ;
нинарˮ:нинар N_ТАРЕ  "rivi" ;
нинарˮ:ниныр N_ТАРЕ  "rivi" ;
нирˮ:нир N_ТАРЕ  "kahva" ;
нирцьʼ:нирць N_ИЛЪЕ  "kulmakarva" ;
нитиˮ:нити N_МЯДО  "pilkka nuolessa" ;
нылʼ:ныл N_ВЫӇО  "lepo" ;
нюе:нюе N_САВНЕ  "lapsiparka" ;
нюмдерˮ:нюмдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "nimitys" ;
нюрˮ:нюр N_ТАРЕ  "poronnahasta kodanrungon peite" ;
няркнабцьʼ:няркнабць N_ИЛЪЕ  "huoli" ;
падарё:падарё N_МЕРЁ  "poksahdus pienillä kipinöillä" ;
парасьʼ:парась N_ИЛЪЕ  "sika" ;
пареʼ:паре N_ВЫӇО  "paaluilla seisova aitta" ;
пахаʼ:паха N_ПАХАЁ  "juuri" ;
пеʼ:пе N_ИЛЪЕ  "kämmen" ;
педˮ:педС1 N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "etusarvi" ;
пензерˮ:пензер N_ТАРЕ  "šamaanirumpu" ;
пензерˮ:пензяр N_ТАРЕ  "šamaanirumpu" ;
пибтяʼ:пибтя N_ВЫӇО  "alahuuli" ;
питˮ:пит N_МЯДО  "pelote" ;
пудё:пудё N_МЕРЁ  "tihkusade" ;
пяныˮ:пяны N_МЯДО  "lähentyminen" ;
сабць:сабць N_САБЦЬ  "sylki" ;
савне:савне N_САВНЕ  "harakka" ;
сарё:сарё N_МЕРЁ  "sade" ;
сеʼ:се N_ИЛЪЕ-Pal/Var  "tuppi" ;
сеˮ:се N_ИДЕ-Pal/Var  "pihka" ;
седˮ:седС1 N_ТАСО/ТЮСЕ  "poronnahasta pieni peite jolla kapaloidaan lasta" ;
седяʼ:седя N_ВЫӇО  "kuura" ;
сиʼ:си N_ИЛЪЕ  "kodan takaosa (pyhä alue)" ;
сиʼ:си N_ИЛЪЕ  "(poro)???" ;
сиʼ:си N_ИЛЪЕ  "kansi" ;
сиˮ:си N_ИДЕ  "huono enne" ;
сидерˮ:сидер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "ikkuna" ;
силерˮ:силер N_ТАРЕ  "harmaalokin poikanen" ;
синдерˮ:синдер N_ТАРЕ  "kansi" ;
соёлё:соёлё N_МЕРЁ  "verso" ;
сыˮнабтˮ:сыˮнабт N_МЯДО  "jarru" ;
сэлʼ:сэл N_ВЫӇО  "kuivuus" ;
сяˮ:ся N_МЯДО  "kasvot" ;
сялʼ:сял N_ВЫӇО  "kainalo" ;
таˮнёʼ:таˮнё N_ВЫӇО  "letti" ;
табадярˮ:табадяр N_МЯДО  "tehtävä" ;
танзерˮ:танзер N_ТАРЕ  "sinerrys" ;
танё:танё N_МЕРЁ  "järveen laskeva joki" ;
тарˮ:тар N_ТАРЕ  "karva" ;
тахаʼ:таха N_ПАХАЁ  "(kodan) lumivalli" ;
тебкабтˮ:тебкабт N_МЯДО  "pölkky satimessa" ;
тирˮ:тир N_ТАРЕ  "pinta" ;
тоʼ:то N_ВЫӇО  "huopa" ;
тодабцьʼ:тодабць N_ИЛЪЕ  "nuotio" ;
тосыˮ:тосы N_МЯДО  "pidättyväisyys" ;
тумъиˮ:тумъи N_МЯДО  "tulen syttymishetki" ;
тыдэʼ:тыдэ N_ВЫӇО  "sembra" ;
тэцяʼ:тэця N_ВЫӇО  "pyyhe" ;
тюˮ:тю N_ТЮСЕ  "merkkipylväs" ;
тюсерˮ:тюсер N_ТАРЕ  "nahanpalanen" ;
тярыˮ:тяры N_МЯДО  "jako" ;
хаˮмаре:хаˮмаре N_САВНЕ  "huuhkaja" ;
хадё:хадё N_МЕРЁ  "vahinko" ;
хаерˮ:хаер N_ВАР/МЯДО  "aurinko" ;
ханзˮ:ханз N_МЯДО  "jalas" ;
ханьзяре:ханьзяре N_САВНЕ  "vanne" ;
харэʼ:харе N_ВЫӇО  "ahtojää" ;
хасё:хасё N_МЕРЁ  "mies" ;
хаце:хаце N_САВНЕ  "häkä" ;
хыберё:хыберё N_МЕРЁ  "koiran vikinä" ;
юдерˮ:юдер N_ВАР/ТАРЕ  "lämpö" ;
юрˮ:юр N_ТАРЕ  "voi" ;
яˮвыˮ:яˮвы N_МЯДО  "solisluu" ;
ядацьʼ:ядаць N_ИЛЪЕ  "matkasauva" ;
ялрё:ялрё N_МЕРЁ  "jylinä" ;
яӈгацьʼ:яӈгаць N_ИЛЪЕ  "nuija" ;
ёʼ:ё N_ВЫӇО  "kulma" ;
ёльцьʼ:ёльць N_ИЛЪЕ  "aika" ;
ёнарˮ:ёнар N_ТАРЕ  "reunasta tehty viimeistely" ;
ёрˮ:ёр N_ТАРЕ-Pal/Var  "hauskutus" ;
ӈабтˮ:ӈабт N_МЯДО  "myrkky" ;
ӈасрё:ӈасрё N_МЕРЁ  "hiljainen ontto ääni" ;
ӈохоʼ:ӈохо N_ВЫӇО  "kupu (riekon)" ;
ӈэвэйцьʼ:ӈэвэйць N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  "kallo" ;
ӈэсяʼ:ӈэся N_ВЫӇО  "säkki" ;
